Utah statutes.
70A-11-107.   Transition provisions as to priorities.
Except as otherwise provided in chapter 11, the old Uniform Commercial Code
shall apply to any questions of priority if the positions of the parties were
fixed prior to the effective date of the corrected Uniform Commercial Code. In
other cases questions of priority shall be determined by the corrected Uniform
Commercial Code.
